Massachusetts, session 194th, H1321.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 176O, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking
out section 19 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 19. Display of information on enrollment cards of carrier
(a) A carrier shall state prominently on the front or back of its enrollment cards the
following:
(1) The statement “This health plan is fully-insured, subject to all Massachusetts
insurance laws.”
(2) The name of the carrier, and the name of the insured’s specific health plan, including
any numbers or other information necessary to identify the insured’s plan.
of 2

(3) A toll-free telephone number for the member services department of the carrier.
(4) The name and toll-free telephone number of the member services department of any
third party that administers behavioral health, prescription drug, or other benefits.
(5) The amount of any copayment under the plan for preventive care visits, office visits,
emergency department visits and prescription drugs.
(6) Whether the plan has a deductible, and the amount of any deductible under the plan.
(7) Any other information required by the commissioner of insurance.
of 2